Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Presidential


Preference Primary Modernization Act of 2025".


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 20-104, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 10551 Page 1


Section 20-104. A. Upon the completion of the state canvass of


the results of the Presidential Preferential Primary, the Secretary


of the State Election Board shall certify to the state chairman of


each political party which has candidates participating in the


primary:


1. the names of the party's candidates and the votes each


received, by congressional district as well as statewide; and


2. the total of the votes cast in the political party, by


congressional district as well as statewide.


B. Each candidate shall be awarded delegates by congressional


districts proportionately, by the ratio of votes they received to


the total vote cast in said congressional district; provided


however, no delegates shall be awarded to any candidate receiving


less than fifteen percent (15%) of the vote, and such votes shall be


allocated among the other candidates in proportion to their total


vote. If no candidate receives fifteen percent (15%) or more of the


vote, then the candidate receiving the highest number of votes in


that district shall be awarded all the delegates from that district.


C. The candidate receiving the largest number of votes


statewide shall be awarded all delegate votes authorized by the


National Committee of the political party which are selected as the


at-large delegates at the state convention of said party.





Req. No. 10551 Page 2


D. Votes shall be allocated on a basis of not less than one-


half (1/2) delegate vote or the minimum allowed by the national


party rules.


E. Each political party shall then select, by a method to be


determined by the party, as many delegates to the national party


convention as are allotted it by the national committee of that


party.


F. No later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth day of January, 1988,


and each year thereafter in which the President and Vice President


of the United States are to be elected, the Attorney General shall


submit to the Secretary of the State Election Board notice of the


manner in which results of the next following Presidential


Preferential Primary are to be certified and to whom said results


are to be certified. The State Election Board shall certify results


according to the manner prescribed in the notice. The Attorney


General shall be required to provide said notice in such a way as to


be consistent with the methods required by the recognized political


parties relative to selection of delegates to their national


conventions.


G. Each delegate or alternate delegate to the national


convention of his political party shall cast their vote on all


ballots for the candidate who received this state's vote. If that


candidate is for any reason no longer a candidate, the votes of the


Oklahoma delegation shall be cast for any candidate of their choice.

Req. No. 10551 Page 3


H. If the political parties involved in the primary elections


will not accept the minimum threshold or other provisions of this


section, or have a different method of allocating the votes of all


candidates falling below such threshold, either as to the


congressional districts or statewide vote, then these matters may be


governed by the respective political parties involved.


I. In the event that the delegates to a political party to the


national convention cast their votes for a candidate other than the


candidate who received this state's vote, except in cases where the


candidate has become deceased or has been declared disabled under


the Twenty-Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution, the


Secretary of the State Election Board shall calculate the total cost


incurred by the state for including that candidate on the ballot.


The Secretary shall issue an invoice to the state central committee


of the political party for the amount calculated. The invoice


issued under the provisions of this section shall include a detailed


accounting of all costs incurred by the state for including the


candidate on the Presidential Preferential Primary ballot, including


but not limited to, administrative expenses, ballot printing, and


election staffing. The political party shall remit full payment to


the State Election Board within ninety (90) days of receiving the


invoice. Failure to pay the invoiced amount within the specified


timeframe shall result in the ineligibility of that political



Req. No. 10551 Page 4


party's candidates to appear on the ballot in the subsequent


Presidential Preferential Primary.


J. If the state central committee of a political party disputes


the amount of an invoice issued pursuant to Subsection I of this


act, it may file a written appeal to the State Election Board within


thirty (30) days of receiving the invoice. The appeal shall specify


the items and amounts in dispute and provide any supporting


documentation or reasoning. Upon receipt of a timely appeal, the


State Election Board shall conduct any necessary hearings or reviews


and issue a written decision and any invoice modifications within


sixty (60) days of receiving the appeal.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-10551 MJ 12/04/24





















Req. No. 10551 Page 5